bulgarian.affix
flag *X:
    А        >      -А,АЛ
    А        >      -А,АЛА
    А        >      -А,АЛАТА
    А        >      -А,АЛИ
    А        >      -А,АЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АЛО
    А        >      -А,АЛОТО
    А        >      -А,АН
    А        >      -А,АНА
    А        >      -А,АНАТА
    А        >      -А,АНИ
    А        >      -А,АНИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АНИЯ
    А        >      -А,АНИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АНО
    А        >      -А,АНОТО
    А        >      -А,АТ
    А        >      -А,АХ
    А        >      -А,АХА
    А        >      -А,АХМЕ
    А        >      -А,АХТЕ
    А        >      -А,Е
    А        >      -А,ЕЙКИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕМ
    А        >      -А,ЕТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕШ
    А        >      -А,ЕШЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИТЕ
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,ЯЛ
    А        >      -А,ЯЛА
    А        >      -А,ЯЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ЯЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЯЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЯЛО
    А        >      -А,ЯЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ЯХ
    А        >      -А,ЯХА
    А        >      -А,ЯХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ЯХТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЯЩ
    А        >      -А,ЯЩА
    А        >      -А,ЯЩАТА
    А        >      -А,ЯЩИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЯЩИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЯЩО
    А        >      -А,ЯЩОТО
    М        >      -М,ДАТ
    М        >      -М,ДЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЛИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЛИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕМ
    М        >      -М,ДЕН
    М        >      -М,ДЕНА
    М        >      -М,ДЕНАТА
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИЯ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНО
    М        >      -М,ДЕНОТО
    М        >      -М,ДЕТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕШ
    М        >      -М,ДЕШЕ
    М        >      -М,ДОХ
    М        >      -М,ДОХА
    М        >      -М,ДОХМЕ
    М        >      -М,ДОХТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛА
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛАТА
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛИЯ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛО
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛОТО
    М        >      -М,ДЯХ
    М        >      -М,ДЯХА
    М        >      -М,ДЯХМЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЯХТЕ
    М        >      -М,Й
    М        >      -М,ЙТЕ
    М        >      -М,Л
    М        >      -М,ЛА
    М        >      -М,ЛАТА
    М        >      -М,ЛИ
    М        >      -М,ЛИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ЛИЯ
    М        >      -М,ЛИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ЛО
    М        >      -М,ЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,А
    Я        >      -Я,АЛ
    Я        >      -Я,АЛА
    Я        >      -Я,АЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,АЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,АЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,АЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,АЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,АЛО
    Я        >      -Я,АЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,АН
    Я        >      -Я,АНА
    Я        >      -Я,АНАТА
    Я        >      -Я,АНИ
    Я        >      -Я,АНИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,АНИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,АНИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,АНО
    Я        >      -Я,АНОТО
    Я        >      -Я,АХ
    Я        >      -Я,АХА
    Я        >      -Я,АХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,АХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,Е
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕМ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
